Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2011
Unauthorized insurers; personal jurisdiction.

Any of the following systematic or continuous acts in this state, effected by mail or otherwise, by an unauthorized foreign or alien insurer: (1) The issuance or delivery of contracts of insurance to residents of this state or to corporations authorized to do business therein, (2) the solicitation of applications for such contracts, (3) the collection of premiums, membership fees, assessments, or other considerations for such contracts, (4) the investigation or payment of claims, or (5) any other transaction of business shall constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over such foreign or alien insurer in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of an insured or beneficiary arising out of any such activities.

Laws 1949, c. 134, § 2, p. 350;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 55;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-137.02.

Conditions of this section met where contractor, with insurer's authorization, included general guaranty bond in individual construction contracts which were solicited in this state. Abel v. Southwest Cas. Ins. Co., 182 Neb. 605, 156 N.W.2d 166 (1968).